Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2.1. Statewide Emergency Medical Services System and Services.

§ 32.1-111.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Advisory Board”
means the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board.

“Automated external defibrillator”
means a medical device which combines a heart monitor and defibrillator and (i) has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, (ii) is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia, (iii) is capable of determining, without intervention by an operator, whether defibrillation should be performed, and (iv) automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to an individual’s heart, upon determining that defibrillation should be performed.

“Emergency medical services”
or

“EMS”

means health care, public health, and public safety services used in the medical response to the real or perceived need for immediate medical assessment, care, or transportation and preventive care or transportation in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury.

“Emergency medical services agency”
or

“EMS agency”

means any person engaged in the business, service, or regular activity, whether for profit or not, of rendering immediate medical care and providing transportation to persons who are sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise incapacitated or helpless and that holds a valid license as an emergency medical services agency issued by the Commissioner in accordance with §

32.1-111.6

.

“Emergency medical services personnel”
or

“EMS personnel”

means individuals who are employed by or members of an emergency medical services agency and who provide emergency medical services pursuant to an emergency medical services agency license issued to that agency by the Commissioner and in accordance with the authorization of that agency’s operational medical director.

“Emergency medical services physician”
or

“EMS physician”

means a physician who holds a current endorsement from the Office of Emergency Medical Services (EMS) and may serve as an EMS agency operational medical director or training program physician course director.

“Emergency medical services provider”
or

“EMS provider”

means any person who holds a valid certificate as an emergency medical services provider issued by the Commissioner.

“Emergency medical services system”
or

“EMS system”

means the system of emergency medical services agencies, vehicles, equipment, and personnel; health care facilities; other health care and emergency services providers; and other components engaged in the planning, coordination, and delivery of emergency medical services in the Commonwealth, including individuals and facilities providing communication and other services necessary to facilitate the delivery of emergency medical services in the Commonwealth.

“Emergency medical services vehicle”
means any vehicle, vessel, or aircraft that holds a valid emergency medical services vehicle permit issued by the Office of Emergency Medical Services that is equipped, maintained, or operated to provide emergency medical care or transportation of patients who are sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise incapacitated or helpless.

“Office of Emergency Medical Services”
means the Office of Emergency Medical Services of the Department.

“Operational medical director”
or

“OMD”

means an EMS physician, currently licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine in the Commonwealth, who is formally recognized and responsible for providing medical direction, oversight, and quality improvement to an EMS agency.

History.

1996, c. 899; 1999, c. 1000; 2000, c. 939; 2008, c. 118; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of health and social service records from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 939 added the paragraph defining “Ambulance,” and rewrote the paragraph defining “Emergency medical services vehicle.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 118 added paragraphs defining “Emergency medical services physician,” “‘Emergency medical services provider’ or ‘EMS provider”’ and “‘Operational medical director’ or ‘OMD.”’

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and rewrote the section.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Emergency medical services agency.” —

A locality may use Four-for-Life funds to provide funding for its local fire department pursuant to § 46.2-694.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Riley E. Ingram, Member, House of Delegates, 18-017, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 15 (9/21/2018).

Flu vaccinations. —

Emergency medical service providers may only administer vaccinations for the H1N1 flu or the seasonal flu when designated and authorized by the State Health Commissioner in accordance with §

32.1-42.1

and subsection P of § 54.1-3408. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-076,
(10/23/09).

§ 32.1-111.2.
Exemptions from provisions of this article.

The following entities are exempted from the provisions of this article:

Emergency medical services agencies based outside the Commonwealth, except that any such agency receiving a person who is sick, injured, wounded, incapacitated, or helpless within the Commonwealth for transportation to a location within the Commonwealth shall comply with the provisions of this article;

Emergency medical services agencies operated by the United States government; and

Wheelchair interfacility transport services and wheelchair interfacility transport service vehicles that are engaged, whether or not for profit, in the business, service, or regular activity of and exclusively used for transporting wheelchair bound passengers between medical facilities in the Commonwealth when no ancillary medical care or oversight is necessary. However, such services and vehicles shall comply with Department of Medical Assistance Services regulations regarding the transportation of Medicaid recipients to covered services.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2005, c. 778; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 778 added subdivision 3 and made minor stylistic and related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “services” for “service” preceding “agencies” in subdivisions 1 and 2.

§ 32.1-111.3.
Statewide Emergency Medical Services Plan; Trauma Triage Plan; Stroke Triage Plan.

The Board of Health shall develop a Statewide Emergency Medical Services Plan that shall provide for a comprehensive, coordinated, emergency medical services system in the Commonwealth and shall review, update, and publish the Plan triennially, making such revisions as may be necessary to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the Commonwealth’s emergency medical services system. The Plan shall incorporate the regional emergency medical services plans prepared by the regional emergency medical services councils pursuant to §

32.1-111.4:2

. Publishing through electronic means and posting on the Department website shall satisfy the publication requirement. The objectives of such Plan and the emergency medical services system shall include the following:

Establishing a comprehensive statewide emergency medical services system, incorporating facilities, transportation, manpower, communications, and other components as integral parts of a unified system that will serve to improve the delivery of emergency medical services and thereby decrease morbidity, hospitalization, disability, and mortality;

Reducing the time period between the identification of an acutely ill or injured patient and the definitive treatment;

Increasing the accessibility of high quality emergency medical services to all citizens of Virginia;

Promoting continuing improvement in system components including ground, water, and air transportation; communications; hospital emergency departments and other emergency medical care facilities; health care provider training and health care service delivery; and consumer health information and education;

Ensuring performance improvement of the emergency medical services system and emergency medical services and care delivered on scene, in transit, in hospital emergency departments, and within the hospital environment;

Working with professional medical organizations, hospitals, and other public and private agencies in developing approaches whereby the many persons who are presently using the existing emergency department for routine, nonurgent, primary medical care will be served more appropriately and economically;

Conducting, promoting, and encouraging programs of education and training designed to upgrade the knowledge and skills of emergency medical services personnel, including expanding the availability of paramedic and advanced life support training throughout the Commonwealth with particular emphasis on regions underserved by emergency medical services personnel having such skills and training;

Consulting with and reviewing, with agencies and organizations, the development of applications to governmental or other sources for grants or other funding to support emergency medical services programs;

Establishing a statewide air medical evacuation system which shall be developed by the Department of Health in coordination with the Department of State Police and other appropriate state agencies;

Establishing and maintaining a process for designation of appropriate hospitals as trauma centers, certified stroke centers, and specialty care centers based on an applicable national evaluation system;

Maintaining a comprehensive emergency medical services patient care data collection and performance improvement system pursuant to Article 3.1 (§

32.1-116.1

et seq.);

Collecting data and information and preparing reports for the sole purpose of the designation and verification of trauma centers and other specialty care centers pursuant to this section. All data and information collected shall remain confidential and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.);

Establishing and maintaining a process for crisis intervention and peer support services for emergency medical services personnel and public safety personnel, including statewide availability and accreditation of critical incident stress management or peer support teams and personnel. Such accreditation standards shall include a requirement that a peer support team be headed by a Virginia-licensed clinical psychologist, Virginia-licensed psychiatrist, Virginia-licensed clinical social worker, or Virginia-licensed professional counselor, who has at least five years of experience as a mental health consultant working directly with emergency medical services personnel or public safety personnel;

Establishing a statewide program of emergency medical services for children to provide coordination and support for emergency pediatric care, availability of pediatric emergency medical care equipment, and pediatric training of health care providers;

Establishing and supporting a statewide system of health and medical emergency response teams, including emergency medical services disaster task forces, coordination teams, disaster medical assistance teams, and other support teams that shall assist local emergency medical services agencies at their request during mass casualty, disaster, or whenever local resources are overwhelmed;

Establishing and maintaining a program to improve dispatching of emergency medical services personnel and vehicles, including establishment of and support for emergency medical services dispatch training, accreditation of 911 dispatch centers, and public safety answering points;

Identifying and establishing best practices for managing and operating emergency medical services agencies, improving and managing emergency medical services response times, and disseminating such information to the appropriate persons and entities;

Ensuring that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be contacted immediately to deploy assistance in the event there are victims as defined in §

19.2-11.01

, and that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund become the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims; and

Maintaining current contact information for both the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund.

The Board of Health shall also develop and maintain as a component of the Emergency Medical Services Plan a statewide prehospital and interhospital Trauma Triage Plan designed to promote rapid access for pediatric and adult trauma patients to appropriate, organized trauma care through the publication and regular updating of information on resources for trauma care and generally accepted criteria for trauma triage and appropriate transfer. The Trauma Triage Plan shall include:

A strategy for maintaining the statewide Trauma Triage Plan through development of regional trauma triage plans that take into account the region’s geographic variations and trauma care capabilities and resources, including hospitals designated as trauma centers pursuant to subsection A and inclusion of such regional plans in the statewide Trauma Triage Plan. The regional trauma triage plans shall be reviewed triennially. Plans should ensure that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be contacted immediately to deploy assistance in the event there are victims as defined in §

19.2-11.01

, and that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund become the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims; and maintain current contact information for both the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund.

A uniform set of proposed criteria for prehospital and interhospital triage and transport of trauma patients developed by the Advisory Board, in consultation with the Virginia Chapter of the American College of Surgeons, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, and prehospital care providers. The Advisory Board may revise such criteria from time to time to incorporate accepted changes in medical practice or to respond to needs indicated by analyses of data on patient outcomes. Such criteria shall be used as a guide and resource for health care providers and are not intended to establish, in and of themselves, standards of care or to abrogate the requirements of §

8.01-581.20

. A decision by a health care provider to deviate from the criteria shall not constitute negligence per se.

A performance improvement program for monitoring the quality of emergency medical services and trauma services, consistent with other components of the Emergency Medical Services Plan. The program shall provide for collection and analysis of data on emergency medical and trauma services from existing validated sources, including the emergency medical services patient care information system, pursuant to Article 3.1 (§

32.1-116.1

et seq.), the Patient Level Data System, and mortality data. The Advisory Board shall review and analyze such data on a quarterly basis and report its findings to the Commissioner. The Advisory Board may execute these duties through a committee composed of persons having expertise in critical care issues and representatives of emergency medical services providers. The program for monitoring and reporting the results of emergency medical services and trauma services data analysis shall be the sole means of encouraging and promoting compliance with the trauma triage criteria.The Commissioner shall report aggregate findings of the analysis annually to each regional emergency medical services council. The report shall be available to the public and shall identify, minimally, as defined in the statewide plan, the frequency of (i) incorrect triage in comparison to the total number of trauma patients delivered to a hospital prior to pronouncement of death and (ii) incorrect interfacility transfer for each region.The Advisory Board or its designee shall ensure that each hospital director or emergency medical services agency chief is informed of any incorrect interfacility transfer or triage, as defined in the statewide Trauma Triage Plan, specific to the hospital or agency and shall give the hospital or agency an opportunity to correct any facts on which such determination is based, if the hospital or agency asserts that such facts are inaccurate. The findings of the report shall be used to improve the Trauma Triage Plan, including triage, and transport and trauma center designation criteria.The Commissioner shall ensure the confidentiality of patient information, in accordance with §

32.1-116.2

. Such data or information in the possession of or transmitted to the Commissioner, the Advisory Board, any committee acting on behalf of the Advisory Board, any hospital or prehospital care provider, any regional emergency medical services council, emergency medical services agency that holds a valid license issued by the Commissioner, or group or committee established to monitor the quality of emergency medical services or trauma services pursuant to this subdivision, or any other person shall be privileged and shall not be disclosed or obtained by legal discovery proceedings, unless a circuit court, after a hearing and for good cause shown arising from extraordinary circumstances, orders disclosure of such data.

The Board shall also develop and maintain as a component of the Statewide Emergency Medical Services Plan a statewide prehospital and interhospital Stroke Triage Plan designed to promote rapid access for stroke patients to appropriate, organized stroke care through the publication and regular updating of information on resources for stroke care and generally accepted criteria for stroke triage and appropriate transfer. The Stroke Triage Plan shall include:

A strategy for maintaining the statewide Stroke Triage Plan through development of regional stroke triage plans that take into account the region’s geographic variations and stroke care capabilities and resources, including hospitals designated as comprehensive stroke centers, primary stroke centers, primary stroke centers with supplementary levels of stroke care distinction, and acute stroke-ready hospitals through certification by the Joint Commission, DNV Healthcare, the American Heart Association, or a comparable process consistent with the recommendations of the Brain Attack Coalition, and inclusion of such regional plans in the statewide Stroke Triage Plan. The regional stroke triage plans shall be reviewed triennially.

A uniform set of proposed criteria for prehospital and interhospital triage and transport of stroke patients developed by the Advisory Board, in consultation with the American Stroke Association, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, and prehospital care providers. The Board may revise such criteria from time to time to incorporate accepted changes in medical practice or to respond to needs indicated by analyses of data on patient outcomes. Such criteria shall be used as a guide and resource for health care providers and are not intended to establish, in and of themselves, standards of care or to abrogate the requirements of §

8.01-581.20

. A decision by a health care provider to deviate from the criteria shall not constitute negligence per se.

Whenever any state-owned aircraft, vehicle, or other form of conveyance is utilized under the provisions of this section, an appropriate amount not to exceed the actual costs of operation may be charged by the agency having administrative control of such aircraft, vehicle, or other form of conveyance.

History.

1996, c. 899; 1997, c. 321; 1998, c. 317; 1999, c. 1000; 2005, cc. 632, 686; 2006, c. 412; 2007, c. 15; 2008, cc. 66, 567; 2009, cc. 222, 269; 2012, c. 418; 2014, c. 320; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2017, c. 609; 2018, cc. 103, 109.

Cross references.

As to privileged communications for critical incident stress management team members, see §

19.2-271.4

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 632 and 686 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “update and publish”
and “to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the Commonwealth’s emergency medical care system” at the end of the second sentence, inserted the third sentence, substituted “making” for “and make”; added the language beginning “including expanding” at the end of subdivision A 7; rewrote subdivision A 13; inserted subdivisions A 14 through A 17; and made minor stylistic changes. The acts added subdivisions A 13 through A 17 in a different order.
The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 412, in the second sentence in the last paragraph of subsection B, deleted “or” preceding “any committee” and inserted “any regional emergency medical services council, permitted emergency medical services agency, or group or committee established to monitor the quality of care pursuant to this subdivision.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 15, in subdivision A 5, substituted “Ensuring performance improvement of the Emergency Medical Services system and” for “Improving the quality” at the beginning and “scene” for “site” near the middle; substituted “professional medical organizations” for “medical societies” in subdivision A 6; in subdivision A 11, substituted “Maintaining” for “Establishing” at the beginning and “performance improvement” for “evaluation” near the end; in subdivision B 1, substituted “maintaining the statewide” for “implementing the statewide” near the beginning and “plans that incorporate” for “plans developed by the regional emergency medical services councils which can incorporate” near the middle of the first sentence, and substituted “shall be reviewed triennially” for “shall be implemented by July 1, 1999, upon the approval of the Commissioner” at end of the second sentence; deleted “consistent with the trauma protocols of the American College of Surgeons’ Committee on Trauma,” from the first sentence in subdivision B 2; in subdivision B 3, inserted “performance improvement” near the beginning of the first sentence, deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “The first such report shall be for the quarter beginning on July 1, 1999.” and inserted “Emergency Medical Services” in the present fourth sentence; deleted “with the first such report representing data submitted for the quarter beginning July 1, 1999, through the quarter ending June 30, 2000” at the end of the first sentence in the first undesignated paragraph of subdivision B 3; inserted “Emergency Medical Services” and inserted “or its designee” following “Advisory Board” near the beginning of the second undesignated paragraph of subdivision B 3; and inserted “Emergency Medical Services” twice and substituted “licensed” for “permitted” in the second sentence in the third undesignated paragraph of subdivision B 3.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 66 and 567 are identical, and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D; and inserted present subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 222 and 269 are identical, and added subdivision A 18 and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 418 deleted “of this chapter” at the end of subdivision A 11 and in subdivision B 3; added “, and that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund become the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims; and” at the end of subdivision A 18, added subdivision A 19, and made related changes; and in subdivision B 1, deleted “of this section” at the end of the first sentence, and added the third sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 320, in subdivision C 1, inserted “DNV Healthcare” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 609 in subdivision A 13, substituted “or peer support teams and personnel” for “teams” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 103 and 109 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “but not be limited to” preceding “the following” at the end of the introductory language; in subdivision A 10, inserted “certified stroke centers”; in subdivision C 1, inserted “comprehensive stroke centers,” “primary stroke centers with supplementary levels of stroke care distinction, and acute stroke-ready hospitals,” and “the American Heart Association.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-111.4.
Regulations; emergency medical services personnel and vehicles; response times; enforcement provisions; civil penalties.

The Board shall prescribe by regulation:

Requirements for recordkeeping, supplies, operating procedures, and other emergency medical services agency operations;

Requirements for the sanitation and maintenance of emergency medical services vehicles and their medical supplies and equipment;

Procedures, including the requirements for forms, to authorize qualified emergency medical services personnel to follow Do Not Resuscitate Orders pursuant to § 54.1-2987.1;

Requirements for the composition, administration, duties, and responsibilities of the Advisory Board;

Requirements, developed in consultation with the Advisory Board, governing the training, certification, and recertification of emergency medical services personnel;

Requirements for written notification to the Advisory Board, the Office of Emergency Medical Services, and the Financial Assistance and Review Committee of the Board’s action, and the reasons therefor, on requests and recommendations of the Advisory Board, the Office of Emergency Medical Services, or the Financial Assistance and Review Committee, no later than five business days after reaching its decision, specifying whether the Board has approved, denied, or not acted on such requests and recommendations;

Authorization procedures, developed in consultation with the Advisory Board, that allow the possession and administration of epinephrine or a medically accepted equivalent for emergency cases of anaphylactic shock by certain levels of certified emergency medical services personnel as authorized by § 54.1-3408 and authorization procedures that allow the possession and administration of oxygen with the authority of the local operational medical director and an emergency medical services agency that holds a valid license issued by the Commissioner;

A uniform definition of “response time” and requirements, developed in consultation with the Advisory Board, for each emergency medical services agency to measure response times starting from the time a call for emergency medical services is received until the time (i) appropriate emergency medical services personnel are responding and (ii) appropriate emergency medical services personnel arrive on the scene, and requirements for emergency medical services agencies to collect and report such data to the Director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services, who shall compile such information and make it available to the public, upon request;

Enforcement provisions, including, but not limited to, civil penalties that the Commissioner may assess against any emergency medical services agency or other entity found to be in violation of any of the provisions of this article or any regulation promulgated under this article. All amounts paid as civil penalties for violations of this article or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall be paid into the state treasury and shall be deposited in the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to § 46.2-694, to be used only for emergency medical services purposes; and

Procedures for when emergency medical services agencies in medically underserved areas as defined by the Board may transport patients to 24-hour urgent care facilities or appropriate medical care facilities other than hospitals. The regulations shall include provisions for what constitutes a medically underserved area, cases appropriate for transferring a patient to a medical facility other than a hospital, and other information deemed relevant by the Board.

The Board shall classify emergency medical services agencies and emergency medical services vehicles by type of service rendered and shall specify the medical equipment, the supplies, the vehicle specifications, and the emergency medical services personnel required for each classification.

In formulating its regulations, the Board shall consider the current Minimal Equipment List for Ambulances adopted by the Committee on Trauma of the American College of Surgeons.

History.

1996, c. 899; 1997, c. 248; 1998, cc. 803, 854; 2001, c. 466; 2003, c. 1020; 2005, c. 921; 2006, c. 194; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2020, c. 930.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 930 was codified as subdivision A 10 of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 466, in subsection A, deleted “and” at the end of subdivision 5, inserted “and” at the end of subdivision 6 and added subdivision 7.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1020 rewrote subdivision A 7, which formerly read: “Requirements, developed in consultation with the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, which allow the possession and administration of epinephrine or a medically accepted equivalent by emergency medical services personnel and that develop appropriate training and education qualifications to carry out such function.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 921 inserted “training” in subdivision A 5, added subdivisions A 8 and A 9, and made a related change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 194 added the language beginning “and authorization procedures” at the end of subdivision A 7.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-111.4:1.
State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board; purpose; membership; duties; reimbursement of expenses; staff support.

There is hereby created in the executive branch the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board for the purpose of advising the Board concerning the administration of the statewide emergency medical services system and emergency medical services vehicles maintained and operated to provide transportation to persons requiring emergency medical treatment and for reviewing and making recommendations on the Statewide Emergency Medical Services Plan. The Advisory Board shall be composed of 28 members appointed by the Governor as follows: one representative each from the Virginia Municipal League, Virginia Association of Counties, Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, and each of the 11 regional emergency medical services councils; one member each from the Medical Society of Virginia, Virginia Chapter of the American College of Emergency Physicians, Virginia Chapter of the American College of Surgeons, Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, Emergency Nurses Association or the Virginia Nurses’ Association, Virginia State Firefighters Association, Virginia Fire Chiefs Association, Virginia Ambulance Association, Virginia Association of Governmental Emergency Medical Services Administrators, and Virginia Association of Public Safety Communications Officials; two representatives of the Virginia Association of Volunteer Rescue Squads, Inc.; one Virginia professional firefighter; and one consumer who shall not be involved in or affiliated with emergency medical services in any capacity. Each organization and group shall submit three nominees from among which the Governor may make appointments. Of the three nominees submitted by each of the regional emergency medical services councils, at least one nominee shall be a representative of providers of prehospital care. Any person appointed to the Advisory Board shall be a member of the organization that he represents. To ensure diversity in the organizations and groups represented on the Advisory Board, the Governor may request additional nominees from the applicable organizations and groups. However, the Governor shall not be bound to make any appointment from among any nominees recommended by such organizations and groups.The members of the Advisory Board shall not be eligible to receive compensation; however, the Department shall provide funding for the reimbursement of expenses incurred by members of the Advisory Board in the performance of their duties.

Appointments shall be staggered as follows: nine members for a term of two years, nine members for a term of three years, and 10 members for a term of four years. Thereafter, appointments shall be for terms of three years, except an appointment to fill a vacancy, which shall be for the unexpired term. Appointments shall be in a manner to preserve insofar as possible the representation of the specified groups. No member shall serve more than two successive terms. No person representing any organization or group named in subsection A who has served as a member of the Advisory Board for two or more successive terms for any period or for six or more consecutive years shall be nominated for appointment or appointed to the Advisory Board unless at least three consecutive years have elapsed since the person has served on the Advisory Board.The chairman shall be elected from the membership of the Advisory Board for a term of one year and shall be eligible for reelection. The Advisory Board shall meet at least four times annually at the call of the chairman or the Commissioner.

The Advisory Board shall:

Advise the Board on the administration of this article;

Review and make recommendations for the Statewide Emergency Medical Services Plan and any revisions thereto; and

Review, on a schedule as it may determine, reports on the status of all aspects of the statewide emergency medical services system, including the Financial Assistance and Review Committee, the Rescue Squad Assistance Fund, the regional emergency medical services councils, and the emergency medical services vehicles, submitted by the Office of Emergency Medical Services.

The Advisory Board shall establish an Advisory Board Executive Committee to assist in the work of the Advisory Board. The Advisory Board Executive Committee shall, in addition to those duties of the Advisory Board Executive Committee established by the Advisory Board, review the annual financial report of the Virginia Association of Volunteer Rescue Squads, as required by §

32.1-111.13

.

The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall provide staff support to the Advisory Board.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 576 and
577, cl. 6 provides: “That the terms of nine members who are currently serving on the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board pursuant to
§

32.1-111.4:1

of the Code of Virginia for a term set to expire June 30, 2024, shall be extended for one year, to expire on June 30, 2025, and all appointments thereafter shall be for terms of three years.”

§ 32.1-111.4:2.
Regional emergency medical services councils.

The Board shall designate regional emergency medical services councils that shall be authorized to receive and disburse public funds. Each such council shall be charged with the development and implementation of an efficient and effective regional emergency medical services delivery system.

The Board shall review those agencies that were the designated regional emergency medical services councils. The Board shall, in accordance with the standards established in its regulations, review and may renew or deny applications for such designations every three years. In its discretion, the Board may establish conditions for renewal of such designations or may solicit applications for designation as a regional emergency medical services council.

Each regional emergency medical services council shall include, if available, representatives of the participating local governments, fire protection agencies, law-enforcement agencies, emergency medical services agencies, hospitals, licensed practicing physicians, emergency care nurses, mental health professionals, emergency medical services personnel, and other appropriate allied health professionals.

Each regional emergency medical services council shall adopt and revise as necessary a regional emergency medical services plan in cooperation with the Board.

The designated regional emergency services councils shall be required to match state funds with local funds obtained from private or public sources in the proportion specified in the regulations of the Board. Moneys received directly or indirectly from the Commonwealth shall not be used as matching funds. A local governing body may choose to appropriate funds for the purpose of providing matching grant funds for any designated regional emergency medical services council. However, this section shall not be construed to place any obligation on any local governing body to appropriate funds to any such council.

The Board shall promulgate, in cooperation with the Advisory Board, regulations to implement this section, which shall include, but not be limited to, requirements to ensure accountability for public funds, criteria for matching funds, and performance standards.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 296 E, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the Board of Health shall not modify the geographic or designated service areas of designated regional emergency medical services councils in effect on January 1, 2008, or make such modifications a criterion in approving or renewing applications for such designation or receiving and disbursing state funds.”

§ 32.1-111.4:3.
Provision of emergency medical services.

Any county, city, or town may provide emergency medical services to its citizens by (i) establishing an emergency medical services agency as a department of government pursuant to §

32.1-111.4:6

or (ii) contracting with or providing for the provision of emergency medical services by an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to §

32.1-111.4:7

.

In cases in which a county, city, or town elects to contract with or provide for emergency medical services by an emergency medical services agency pursuant to clause (ii) of subsection A, the emergency medical services agency shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the county, city, or town and, as such, exempt from suit for damages done incident to the provision of emergency medical services therein unless the emergency medical services agency is a private, for-profit emergency medical services agency.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.